Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1227
Certificate of number; lost or destroyed;
replacement; fee.

In the event of loss or destruction of
the certificate of number, the owner of the vessel shall apply to the county
treasurer on forms provided by the commission for replacement of
such lost certificate of number. Upon satisfactory proof of loss and the payment
to the county treasurer of a fee of not less than one dollar
and not more than five dollars, as established by the commission, the county
treasurer shall issue a duplicate certificate of number.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 38;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 399;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 14.